Louisiana, session 2026, HB425.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:1430 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1430. Unfair or deceptive trade practice; misleading communications with artificial
intelligence systems
A. As used in this Section, "automated system" means a chatbot, artificial
intelligence agent, avatar, or other computer technology that engages in a textual or
aural conversation and may mislead or deceive a reasonable person to believe the
person is engaging with an actual human being.
B. It is an unfair or deceptive trade practice for a corporation, organization,
or person to engage in a commercial transaction or trade practice with a consumer
in this state in which the consumer is communicating or otherwise interacting with
an automated system and either of the following applies:
(1) The consumer is not notified in a clear and conspicuous manner that the
consumer is communicating with an automated system and not a human being.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1074 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 425
(2) The consumer may reasonably believe he is engaging with a human.
C. A consumer subjected to a commercial transaction that does not comply
with Subsection B of this Section may initiate a civil action against the corporation,
organization, or person that engaged in that transaction.
D. A corporation, organization, or person that fails to comply with this
Section with respect to any consumer is liable to the consumer for actual damages
sustained by the consumer as a result of the violation plus statutory damages not to
exceed one thousand dollars, or in the case of a class action, an amount the court
determines for the class, not to exceed ten million dollars.
E. The attorney general may seek injunctive relief against a corporation,
organization, or person that fails to comply with this Section.
F. A corporation, organization, or person found by a court to be in violation
of this Section is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five million dollars.